New York, session 2025-2026, A103.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Article 25 of the public health law is amended by adding a 2 new title 9 to read as follows: 3 TITLE IX 4 RECALL SUBSCRIPTION INFORMATION 5 Section 2599-e. Physician posting of recall subscription information. 6 § 2599-e. Physician posting of recall subscription information. 1. As 7 used in this section, "primary care physician" means a physician 8 specialist in the field of family practice, general pediatrics, primary 9 care internal medicine or primary care obstetrics and gynecology, who 10 provides coordinated primary care services. 11 2. The commissioner shall require that every primary care physician 12 post in a place or places, clearly visible to all persons, adjacent to 13 or near the location such primary care physician has designated for the 14 receipt of payment, an informational notice. Such notice shall be 15 designed by the commissioner in conjunction with the secretary of state 16 and shall contain information detailing how parents or guardians of 17 infants and children can subscribe to the United States consumer product 18 safety commission's e-mail subscription lists to receive consumer prod- 19 uct recall and safety news by e-mail from the United States consumer 20 product safety commission and such other material as deemed appropriate 21 by the commissioner. Such notice shall be made available to primary care EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00877-01-5 A. 103 2 1 physicians by the department on its website and shall be provided in 2 English, as well as in the six languages other than English most 3 frequently spoken in the state according to the latest available data 4 from the United States Census Bureau and upon request from a primary 5 care physician, any other language spoken by a significant number of 6 people within the community served by such primary care physician. A 7 primary care physician shall post such notice in English and in any 8 other language spoken by significant numbers of people within the commu- 9 nity such physician serves. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 11 it shall have become a law; provided, however, that effective immediate- 12 ly, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 13 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 14 authorized and directed to be made and completed by the commissioner of 15 health on or before such effective date.